Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-408
Treatment of qualified patients.

(1) A qualified patient may make decisions regarding life-sustaining treatment so long as the patient is able to do so.

(2) The Rights of the Terminally Ill Act shall not affect the responsibility of the attending physician or other health care provider to provide treatment, including nutrition and hydration, for a patient's comfort care or alleviation of pain.

(3) Life-sustaining treatment shall not be withheld or withdrawn pursuant to a declaration from an individual known to the attending physician to be pregnant so long as it is probable that the fetus will develop to the point of live birth with continued application of life-sustaining treatment.

Laws 1992, LB 671, § 8.